Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1075.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7114. (1) U.S. standards for shell eggs are adopted by reference. (2) Eggs described by the United States department Department of agriculture Agriculture as black rots, white rots, mixed rots (addled eggs), sour eggs, eggs with green whites, stuck yolks, blood rings or embryos beyond blood ring stage, moldy eggs, musty eggs, bloody whites, crusted yolks, eggs with abnormal odors, and any eggs which that contain wholly or in part a tainted, disease, filthy, decomposed, or putrid substance are eggs unfit for human food. (3) A person shall not sell, offer, or expose for sale to the consumer or to the retail trade, or have in his or her the person's possession with intent to sell to the consumer, or to the retail trade, any egg unfit for human food. Such an If the egg shall is unfit for human food, the egg must be broken out of the shell and denatured or destroyed by methods approved by the director so that it the egg cannot be used for human food. (4) The final determination of all grade and quality factors of an official sample of shell eggs from domesticated chickens shall must be made by visual examination of the egg to determine cleanliness, soundness of shell, and exterior quality, and by candling or breaking to determine interior quality. The examination shall be made by a A competent representative authorized by the director shall make the examination required under this section. The representative shall certify the results of the examination and his or her the certificate shall be is prima facie evidence of the facts certified to in any court where the certificate is offered in evidence. (5) All eggs from domesticated chickens sold, offered, or exposed for sale, or advertised for sale by a retailer or wholesaler shall must be marked as follows to conform to the following applicable size requirement: (a) "Jumbo", if the eggs weigh at the rate of not less than 30 ounces per dozen, with no eggs below the rate of 29 ounces per dozen. (b) "Extra large", if the eggs weigh at the rate of not less than 27 ounces per dozen, with no eggs below the rate of 26 ounces per dozen. (c) "Large", if the eggs weigh at the rate of not less than 24 ounces per dozen, with no eggs below the rate of 23 ounces per dozen. (d) "Medium", if the eggs weigh at the rate of not less than 21 ounces per dozen, with no eggs below the rate of 20 ounces per dozen. (e) "Small", if the eggs weigh at the rate of not less than 18 ounces per dozen, with no eggs below the rate of 17 ounces per dozen. (f) "Peewee", if the eggs weigh at the rate of not less than 15 ounces per dozen. (6) All advertising of eggs shall must include the correct unabbreviated size designation in describing eggs. The correct unabbreviated size designation shall must also appear on the exterior of any container, open or closed, in which eggs are offered for sale to the retailer or the consumer. (7) A person or a person's agents shall not by himself or herself or his or her agents sell, offer, or expose for sale, advertise, or in any manner represent for sale as strictly fresh, hennery, new laid, best, grade A, number 1, fancy, special, extra, selected, direct from the farm, or under any word, figures, symbols, or description of similar import, any eggs which that are not fresh. An egg is not considered fresh unless it the egg meets the standards of quality specified for the U.S. AA or A quality, or the equivalent, as designated in U.S. standards for shell eggs for individual eggs or in standards prescribed by the director by rule. (8) All Except as otherwise provided in subsection (10), all eggs from domesticated chickens sold, offered or exposed for sale, or advertised for sale by a retailer or wholesaler shall must be labeled or marked to conform to one 1 of the following grade requirements: (a) Eggs that fully meet the specifications of U.S. AA quality or fresh fancy quality, or the equivalent thereof, as described in U.S. standards for shell eggs, shall must be labeled and advertised as grade AA or fresh fancy eggs, Michigan seal of quality eggs, grade A or grade B eggs. (b) Eggs that fully meet the specifications of the U.S. A quality, or the equivalent thereof, as described in U.S. standards for shell eggs, shall must be labeled and advertised as grade A or grade B eggs. (c) Eggs that fully meet the specifications of a U.S. B quality, or the equivalent thereof, as described in U.S. standards for shell eggs, shall must be labeled and advertised as grade B eggs. (d) Eggs that do not meet the grade requirements of subdivision (a), (b), or (c) shall must not be offered for sale or sold in the shell. Those eggs may be broken out of the shell at the grading plant or grading station or may be offered for sale or sold to an egg breaking plant. (9) Eggs shall must be held and transported at or below 45 degrees Fahrenheit ambient temperature beginning 36 hours after time of lay. If the eggs are to be processed as table eggs and are not processed for the ultimate consumer within 36 hours from after the time of lay and, therefore, are held and transported as required at or below 45 degrees Fahrenheit ambient temperature, then the eggs may be held at room temperature for no not more than 36 hours just prior to before processing to allow an equilibration step to temper the eggs. (10) This act does not apply to a person who that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is directly responsible for producing eggs from fewer than 3,000 hens. (b) Only sells eggs directly to 1 or more of the following: (i) Directly to consumers. or first (ii) Directly to first receivers. (iii) Directly to retail food establishments by consignment if the following criteria are met: (A) The eggs are sold in an area of the retail food establishment that is separate from the sale of eggs from licensed facilities. (B) The retail food establishment only sells eggs in containers that are labeled with the producer or farm name and direct contact information. (C) The retail food establishment only sells eggs in containers that do not contain the name of brand, company, or producer that is not the producer of the eggs. (c) Only sells eggs in containers that each bear have a label stating that states "packaged in a facility that has not been inspected by the department.". (d) Only sells eggs in containers that are clean and free of contamination before use. (e) (d) Does not sell eggs through the internet or by mail order. or consignment. (f) Does not sell eggs by consignment except as provided under subdivision (b)(iii).